Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0907.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. The legislature declares that the tenth day of the month of Dhul Hijjah, according to the Islamic Hijri calendar, shall be known as "Eid al-Adha". Sec. 2. The legislature declares that the first day of the month of Shawwal, according to the Islamic Hijri calendar, shall be known as "Eid al-Fitr". Sec. 3. The legislature declares that the eighteenth day of the month of Dhul Hijjah, according to the Islamic Hijri calendar, shall be known as "Eid al-Ghadeer".